tex/generic/hyph-utf8/patterns/hyph-tr.tex
% A mechanically generated Turkish Hyphenation table for TeX,
% using the University of Washington diacritical coding
% developed by P. A. MacKay for the Ottoman Texts Project.
%
% see:
% - http://www.ctan.org/tex-archive/language/turkish/hyphen/turk_hyf.c
% - http://www.tug.org/TUGboat/Articles/tb09-1/tb20mackay.pdf
%
% ---
% 1996: conversion into Modern Turkish, DC/EC encoding, Yannis Haralambous
%       tkhyph.tex
%
% 2008: notes by Mojca Miklavec
%
% Original patterns need special fonts to be able to use them,
% and use several tricks that only enable same hacks to work properly.
% 
% I did not dive into details of conversion, but modern Turkish only uses:
% - 4 "special" vowels: ıiöü
% - 3 additional consonants: çğş
% while the converted patterns also use:
% - acircumflex: â
% - ocircumflex: ô
% - ntilde: ñ
% One could argue that these are used just because they can,
% but on the other hand there is no zdotaccent (ż).
% 
% The conversion misencoded dotlessi into ^^11 (should be ^^19).
% 
% 2008: patterns converted into Unicode.
% Several characters could be added or removed, but I (Mojca) could not play the judge
% and did not do any changes, even though I originally intended to fix turk_hyf.c.
% 
% -------
% Original encoding:
% 
% a
% a=  â
% e
% i   ı
% i=  î
% i:  i
% o
% o=  ô
% o:  ö
% u
% u:  ü
% 
% -------
% 
% character / UTF-8 letter / EC code / Unicode / Unicode name
% 
% @      -- arabic hamza
% #      -- ayn
% b
% c
% c:  ç  E7 U+00E7   LATIN SMALL LETTER C WITH CEDILLA
% d
% d!  ḍ  -- U+1E0D   LATIN SMALL LETTER D WITH DOT BELOW
% d=  ḏ  -- U+1E0F   LATIN SMALL LETTER D WITH LINE BELOW
% f
% g
% g=  ğ  A7 U+011F   LATIN SMALL LETTER G WITH BREVE
% g:  ġ  -- U+0121   LATIN SMALL LETTER G WITH DOT ABOVE
% h
% h!  ḥ  -- U+1E25   LATIN SMALL LETTER H WITH DOT BELOW
% h=  ẖ  -- U+1E96   LATIN SMALL LETTER H WITH LINE BELOW
% j
% k
% k!  ḳ  -- U+1E33   LATIN SMALL LETTER K WITH DOT BELOW
% l
% m
% n
% n=  ñ  F1 U+00F1   LATIN SMALL LETTER N WITH TILDE
% p
% r
% s
% s!  ṣ  -- U+1E63   LATIN SMALL LETTER S WITH DOT BELOW
% s=     --    s with line below - not even in unicode
% s:  ş  B3 U+015F   LATIN SMALL LETTER S WITH CEDILLA
% t
% t!  ṭ  -- U+1E6D   LATIN SMALL LETTER T WITH DOT BELOW
% t=  ṯ  -- U+1E6F   LATIN SMALL LETTER T WITH LINE BELOW
% v
% y
% z
% z!  ẓ  -- U+1E93   LATIN SMALL LETTER Z WITH DOT BELOW
% z=  ẕ  -- U+1E95   LATIN SMALL LETTER Z WITH LINE BELOW
% z:  ż  BB U+017C   LATIN SMALL LETTER Z WITH DOT ABOVE
% 
\patterns{
2a1
2e1
2ı1
2o1
2u1
1b1
1c1
1d1
1f1
1g1
1h1
1j1
1k1
1l1
1m1
1n1
1p1
1r1
1s1
1t1
1v1
1y1
1z1
2bâ.
2bî.
2bi.
2bô.
2bö.
2bü.
2câ.
2cî.
2ci.
2cô.
2cö.
2cü.
2ça.
2çâ.
2çe.
2çı.
2çî.
2çi.
2ço.
2çô.
2çö.
2çu.
2çü.
2dâ.
2dî.
2di.
2dô.
2dö.
2dü.
2fâ.
2fî.
2fi.
2fô.
2fö.
2fü.
2gâ.
2gî.
2gi.
2gô.
2gö.
2gü.
2ğa.
2ğâ.
2ğe.
2ğı.
2ğî.
2ği.
2ğo.
2ğô.
2ğö.
2ğu.
2ğü.
2hâ.
2hî.
2hi.
2hô.
2hö.
2hü.
2jâ.
2jî.
2ji.
2jô.
2jö.
2jü.
2kâ.
2kî.
2ki.
2kô.
2kö.
2kü.
2lâ.
2lî.
2li.
2lô.
2lö.
2lü.
2mâ.
2mî.
2mi.
2mô.
2mö.
2mü.
2nâ.
2nî.
2ni.
2nô.
2nö.
2nü.
2ña.
2ñâ.
2ñe.
2ñı.
2ñî.
2ñi.
2ño.
2ñô.
2ñö.
2ñu.
2ñü.
2pâ.
2pî.
2pi.
2pô.
2pö.
2pü.
2râ.
2rî.
2ri.
2rô.
2rö.
2rü.
2sâ.
2sî.
2si.
2sô.
2sö.
2sü.
2şa.
2şâ.
2şe.
2şı.
2şî.
2şi.
2şo.
2şô.
2şö.
2şu.
2şü.
2tâ.
2tî.
2ti.
2tô.
2tö.
2tü.
2vâ.
2vî.
2vi.
2vô.
2vö.
2vü.
2yâ.
2yî.
2yi.
2yô.
2yö.
2yü.
2zâ.
2zî.
2zi.
2zô.
2zö.
2zü.
2e2cek.
2bb
2bc
2bç
2bd
2bf
2bg
2bğ
2bh
2bj
2bk
2bl
2bm
2bn
2bñ
2bp
2br
2bs
2bş
2bt
2bv
2by
2bz
2cb
2cc
2cç
2cd
2cf
2cg
2cğ
2ch
2cj
2ck
2cl
2cm
2cn
2cñ
2cp
2cr
2cs
2cş
2ct
2cv
2cy
2cz
2çb
2çc
2çç
2çd
2çf
2çg
2çğ
2çh
2çj
2çk
2çl
2çm
2çn
2çñ
2çp
2çr
2çs
2çş
2çt
2çv
2çy
2çz
2db
2dc
2dç
2dd
2df
2dg
2dğ
2dh
2dj
2dk
2dl
2dm
2dn
2dñ
2dp
2dr
2ds
2dş
2dt
2dv
2dy
2dz
2fb
2fc
2fç
2fd
2ff
2fg
2fğ
2fh
2fj
2fk
2fl
2fm
2fn
2fñ
2fp
2fr
2fs
2fş
2ft
2fv
2fy
2fz
2gb
2gc
2gç
2gd
2gf
2gg
2gğ
2gh
2gj
2gk
2gl
2gm
2gn
2gñ
2gp
2gr
2gs
2gş
2gt
2gv
2gy
2gz
2ğb
2ğc
2ğç
2ğd
2ğf
2ğg
2ğğ
2ğh
2ğj
2ğk
2ğl
2ğm
2ğn
2ğñ
2ğp
2ğr
2ğs
2ğş
2ğt
2ğv
2ğy
2ğz
2hb
2hc
2hç
2hd
2hf
2hg
2hğ
2hh
2hj
2hk
2hl
2hm
2hn
2hñ
2hp
2hr
2hs
2hş
2ht
2hv
2hy
2hz
2jb
2jc
2jç
2jd
2jf
2jg
2jğ
2jh
2jj
2jk
2jl
2jm
2jn
2jñ
2jp
2jr
2js
2jş
2jt
2jv
2jy
2jz
2kb
2kc
2kç
2kd
2kf
2kg
2kğ
2kh
2kj
2kk
2kl
2km
2kn
2kñ
2kp
2kr
2ks
2kş
2kt
2kv
2ky
2kz
2lb
2lc
2lç
2ld
2lf
2lg
2lğ
2lh
2lj
2lk
2ll
2lm
2ln
2lñ
2lp
2lr
2ls
2lş
2lt
2lv
2ly
2lz
2mb
2mc
2mç
2md
2mf
2mg
2mğ
2mh
2mj
2mk
2ml
2mm
2mn
2mñ
2mp
2mr
2ms
2mş
2mt
2mv
2my
2mz
2nb
2nc
2nç
2nd
2nf
2ng
2nğ
2nh
2nj
2nk
2nl
2nm
2nn
2nñ
2np
2nr
2ns
2nş
2nt
2nv
2ny
2nz
2ñb
2ñc
2ñç
2ñd
2ñf
2ñg
2ñğ
2ñh
2ñj
2ñk
2ñl
2ñm
2ñn
2ññ
2ñp
2ñr
2ñs
2ñş
2ñt
2ñv
2ñy
2ñz
2pb
2pc
2pç
2pd
2pf
2pg
2pğ
2ph
2pj
2pk
2pl
2pm
2pn
2pñ
2pp
2pr
2ps
2pş
2pt
2pv
2py
2pz
2rb
2rc
2rç
2rd
2rf
2rg
2rğ
2rh
2rj
2rk
2rl
2rm
2rn
2rñ
2rp
2rr
2rs
2rş
2rt
2rv
2ry
2rz
2sb
2sc
2sç
2sd
2sf
2sg
2sğ
2sh
2sj
2sk
2sl
2sm
2sn
2sñ
2sp
2sr
2ss
2sş
2st
2sv
2sy
2sz
2şb
2şc
2şç
2şd
2şf
2şg
2şğ
2şh
2şj
2şk
2şl
2şm
2şn
2şñ
2şp
2şr
2şs
2şş
2şt
2şv
2şy
2şz
2tb
2tc
2tç
2td
2tf
2tg
2tğ
2th
2tj
2tk
2tl
2tm
2tn
2tñ
2tp
2tr
2ts
2tş
2tt
2tv
2ty
2tz
2vb
2vc
2vç
2vd
2vf
2vg
2vğ
2vh
2vj
2vk
2vl
2vm
2vn
2vñ
2vp
2vr
2vs
2vş
2vt
2vv
2vy
2vz
2yb
2yc
2yç
2yd
2yf
2yg
2yğ
2yh
2yj
2yk
2yl
2ym
2yn
2yñ
2yp
2yr
2ys
2yş
2yt
2yv
2yy
2yz
2zb
2zc
2zç
2zd
2zf
2zg
2zğ
2zh
2zj
2zk
2zl
2zm
2zn
2zñ
2zp
2zr
2zs
2zş
2zt
2zv
2zy
2zz
a3a2
a3â2
a3e2
a3ı2
a3î2
a3i2
a3o2
a3ô2
a3ö2
a3u2
a3ü2
â3a2
â3â2
â3e2
â3ı2
â3î2
â3i2
â3o2
â3ô2
â3ö2
â3u2
â3ü2
e3a2
e3â2
e3e2
e3ı2
e3î2
e3i2
e3o2
e3ô2
e3ö2
e3u2
e3ü2
ı3a2
ı3â2
ı3e2
ı3ı2
ı3î2
ı3i2
ı3o2
ı3ô2
ı3ö2
ı3u2
ı3ü2
î3a2
î3â2
î3e2
î3ı2
î3î2
î3i2
î3o2
î3ô2
î3ö2
î3u2
î3ü2
i3a2
i3â2
i3e2
i3ı2
i3î2
i3i2
i3o2
i3ô2
i3ö2
i3u2
i3ü2
o3a2
o3â2
o3e2
o3ı2
o3î2
o3i2
o3o2
o3ô2
o3ö2
o3u2
o3ü2
ô3a2
ô3â2
ô3e2
ô3ı2
ô3î2
ô3i2
ô3o2
ô3ô2
ô3ö2
ô3u2
ô3ü2
ö3a2
ö3â2
ö3e2
ö3ı2
ö3î2
ö3i2
ö3o2
ö3ô2
ö3ö2
ö3u2
ö3ü2
u3a2
u3â2
u3e2
u3ı2
u3î2
u3i2
u3o2
u3ô2
u3ö2
u3u2
u3ü2
ü3a2
ü3â2
ü3e2
ü3ı2
ü3î2
ü3i2
ü3o2
ü3ô2
ü3ö2
ü3u2
ü3ü2
.â2
.î2
.i2
.ô2
.ö2
.ü2
tu4r4k
m1t4rak
}
